California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(C) Any disallowance of a credit claimed due to the limitations specified in this subdivision shall be treated as a mathematical error appearing on the return. Any amount of tax resulting from that disallowance may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as provided in Section 19051.

(4) The credit allowed under this section must be claimed on a timely filed original return.

(d) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and the seven succeeding years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(e) A credit shall not be
 allowed unless the credit was reflected within the bid upon which the qualified taxpayer’s prime contract or subcontract to manufacture property for ultimate use in or as a component of a New Advanced Strategic Aircraft Program is based by reducing the amount of the bid by a good faith estimate of the amount of the credit allowable under this section.

(f) All references to the credit and ultimate cost reductions incorporated into any successful bid that was awarded a prime contract or subcontract and for which a qualified taxpayer is making a claim shall be made available to the Franchise Tax Board upon request.

(g) If the qualified taxpayer is allowed a credit pursuant to this section for qualified wages paid or incurred, only one credit shall be allowed to the taxpayer under this part with respect to any wage consisting in whole or in part of those qualified wages.

(h) (1) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe regulations necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(2) The Franchise Tax Board may also prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 274.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.   Repealed as of December 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23640.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, and before January 1, 2036, there shall be allowed to qualified taxpayer, a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, in an amount equal to 20 percent of the qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) per qualified taxpayer per taxable year.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Bank” means the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank established under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 63021) of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code.

(2) “Eligible transmission project” means a project as defined in Section 63049.71 of the Government Code and that meets the criteria and conditions of Sections 12100.111 and 12100.111.5 of the Government Code.

(3) “Qualified expenditures” means costs paid or incurred for planning, design, engineering, permitting, construction, and equipment directly related to the eligible transmission project or qualified wages paid or incurred to employees of a qualified taxpayer that perform services directly related to the eligible transmission project.

(4) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer that is a participating party, as defined in subdivision (i) of section 63049.71 of the Government Code.

(5) “Qualified wages” means wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding seven years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(d) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, a deduction otherwise allowed under this part for any amount of qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer shall be reduced by the amount
 of the qualified expenditures taken into account in calculating the credit allowed by this section.

(e) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, the taxpayer shall not earn a return on equity for the eligible transmission project pursuant to Article 10.5 (commencing with Section 63049.71) of Chapter 2 of Division 1 of Title 6.7 of the Government Code for the portion of the project for which the credit is claimed.

(f) The bank shall inform the Franchise Tax Board of any eligible transmission project that the bank approves for financial assistance pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 63049.73 of the Government Code and shall provide any other information the Franchise Tax Board requires for administration of the credit allowed by this section.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board may
 prescribe regulations that are necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section.

(h) Section 41 shall not apply to this section.

(i) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2036, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 258, Sec. 10.   (AB 192)   Effective September 18, 2026.   Repealed as of December 1, 2036, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23642.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1996, there shall be allowed as a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, the amount paid or incurred for eligible access expenditures. The credit shall be allowed in accordance with Section 44 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to expenditures to provide access to disabled individuals, except that the credit amount specified in subdivision (b) shall be substituted for the credit amount specified in Section 44(a) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The credit amount allowed under this section shall be 50 percent of so much of the eligible access expenditures for the taxable year as do not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(c) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following year, and succeeding years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 85.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

23663.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for each taxable year beginning on or after July 1, 2008, any credit allowed to a taxpayer under this chapter that is an eligible credit may be assigned by that taxpayer to
 any eligible assignee.

(2) A credit assigned under paragraph (1) may only be applied by the eligible assignee against the “tax” (as defined in Section 23036) of the eligible assignee in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2010.

(3) Except as specifically provided in this section, following an assignment of any eligible credit under this section, the eligible assignee shall be treated as if it originally earned the assigned credit.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Affiliated corporation” means a corporation that is a member of a commonly controlled group as defined in Section 25105.

(2) “Eligible credit” shall mean:

(A) Any credit earned by the taxpayer in a taxable year beginning on or after July 1, 2008, or

(B) Any credit earned in any taxable year beginning before July 1, 2008, that is eligible to be carried forward to the taxpayer’s first taxable year beginning on or after July 1, 2008, under the provisions of this part.

(3) “Eligible assignee” shall mean any affiliated corporation that is properly treated as a member of the same combined reporting group pursuant to Section 25101 or 25110 as the taxpayer assigning the eligible credit as of:

(A) In the case of credits earned in taxable years beginning before July 1, 2008:

(i) June 30, 2008, and

(ii) The last day of the taxable year of the assigning taxpayer in which the eligible credit is assigned.

(B) In the case of credits earned in taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2008.

(i) The last day of the first taxable year in which the credit was allowed to the taxpayer, and

(ii) The last day of the taxable year of the assigning taxpayer in which the eligible credit is assigned.

(c) (1) The election to assign any credit under subdivision (a) shall be irrevocable once made, and shall be made by the taxpayer allowed that credit on its original return for the taxable year in which the assignment is made.

(2) The taxpayer assigning any credit
 under this section shall reduce the amount of its unused credit by the face amount of any credit assigned under this section, and the amount of the assigned credit shall not be available for application against the assigning taxpayer’s “tax” in any taxable year, nor shall it thereafter be included in the amount of any credit carryover of the assigning taxpayer.

(3) The eligible assignee of any credit under this section may apply all or any portion of the assigned credits against the “tax” of the eligible assignee for the taxable year in which the assignment occurs, or any subsequent taxable year, subject to any carryover period limitations that apply to the assigned credit and also subject to the limitation in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a).

(4) In no case may the eligible assignee sell, otherwise transfer, or thereafter assign the assigned credit to any other taxpayer.

(d) (1) No consideration shall be required to be paid by the eligible assignee to the assigning taxpayer for assignment of any credit under this section.

(2) In the event that any consideration is paid by the eligible assignee to the assigning taxpayer for the transfer of an eligible credit under this section, then:

(A) No deduction shall be allowed to the eligible assignee under this part with respect to any amounts so paid, and

(B) No amounts so received by the assigning taxpayer shall be includable in gross income under this part.

(e) (1) The Franchise Tax Board shall specify the form and manner in which the election required under this section
 shall be made, as well as any necessary information that shall be required to be provided by the taxpayer assigning the credit to the eligible assignee.

(2) Any taxpayer who assigns any credit under this section shall report any information, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, necessary to substantiate any credit assigned under this section and verify the assignment and subsequent application of any assigned credit.

(3) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2).

(4) The Franchise Tax Board may issue any regulations necessary to implement the purposes of
 this section, including any regulations necessary to specify the treatment of any assignment that does not comply with the requirements of this section (including, for example, where the taxpayer and eligible assignee are not properly treated as members of the same combined reporting group on any of the dates specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b).

(f) (1) The taxpayer and the eligible assignee shall be jointly and severally liable for any tax, addition to tax, or penalty that results from the disallowance, in whole or in part, of any eligible credit assigned under this section.

(2) Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the Franchise Tax Board to audit either the assigning taxpayer or the eligible assignee with respect to any eligible credit assigned under this section.

(g) On or before June 30, 2013, the Franchise Tax Board shall report to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, the Legislative Analyst, and the relevant policy committees of both houses on the effects of this section. The report shall include, but need not be limited to, the following:

(1) An estimate of use of credits in the 2010 and 2011 taxable years by eligible taxpayers.

(2) An analysis of effect of this section on expanding business activity in the state related to these credits.

(3) An estimate of the resulting tax revenue loss to the state.

(4) The report shall cover all credits covered in this section, but focus on the credits related to research and development, economic incentive areas, and low-income housing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 282.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

23664.

(a) (1) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, to a qualified taxpayer equal to 25 percent of the total amount of the qualified taxpayer’s qualified expenditures in the taxable year, subject to paragraph (2).

(2) (A) The credit allowable under this section in any taxable year to any qualified taxpayer shall be limited to a maximum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(B) For qualified taxpayers that are required to be included in a combined report under Section 25101 or authorized to be included in
 a combined report under Section 25101.15, the limit specified in subparagraph (A) shall be the aggregate amount of the credit claimed by all taxpayers that are required to be or authorized to be included in a combined report and in no instance shall the aggregate amount of credit claimed by a combined group exceed the limit specified in subparagraph (A).

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Full-time employee” means an individual who is either of the following:

(A) Paid wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code by the qualified taxpayer for services not less than an average of 35 hours per week.

(B) A salaried employee who was paid compensation during the taxable year for full-time
 employment, as described in Section 515 of the Labor Code, by the qualified taxpayer that is paid wages subject to withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(2) “Minimum wage” means the wage established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(3) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred by a qualified taxpayer for any of the following:

(A) Employment compensation for the full-time employees of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subparagraph, “employment compensation” means wages paid to full-time employees who are paid no less than 150 percent but no more than 350 percent of the applicable minimum wage. The calculation of wages pursuant to this subparagraph may include the monetary
 value to the full-time employee of employer-provided group health insurance benefits, childcare benefits, employer contributions to employer-provided retirement benefits, or employer contributions to pension benefits.

(B) Safety-related equipment, training, and services. For purposes of this subparagraph, “safety-related equipment, training, and services” means equipment primarily used by employees of cannabis licensees to ensure their personal and occupational safety or the safety of customers of the cannabis licensees; training for nonmanagement employees on workplace hazards, including, but not limited to, training required pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 26051.5 of the Business and Professions Code; and services, including, but not limited to, safety audits, security guards, security cameras, and fire risk mitigation.

(C) Workforce
 development and safety training for employees of the qualified taxpayer. For purposes of this subparagraph, “workforce development” includes, but is not limited to, joint labor management training programs, membership in a joint apprenticeship training committee registered by the Division of Apprenticeship Standards, and a state-recognized high road training partnership as defined in Section 14005 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(4) “Qualified taxpayer” means a commercial cannabis business, licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code, and that provides full-time employees with all of the following:

(A) Employment compensation, as described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3).

(B) Employer-provided group health insurance.

(C) Employer-provided retirement benefits or pension benefits, including stock in the duly licensed commercial cannabis employer to employees under employee stock ownership plans where the employer pays for the full value of the stock.

(D) Possesses a Type-10 or a Type-12 license pursuant to Section 26050 of the Business and Professions Code.

(c) The total aggregate amount of the credit that may be allocated by credit reservations to all qualified taxpayers pursuant to this section and Section 17053.64 shall not exceed twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) for all taxable years, cumulatively.

(d) To be eligible for the credit allowed by this section, a qualified taxpayer shall request a credit reservation from the Franchise Tax Board during the month of
 July for each taxable year or within 30 days of the start of their taxable year if the qualified taxpayer’s taxable year begins after July, in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) To obtain a credit reservation with respect to a qualified expenditure, the qualified taxpayer shall provide all necessary information, as determined by the Franchise Tax Board.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board shall approve tentative credit reservations with respect to qualified expenditures incurred during a taxable year for qualified taxpayers, subject to the cap established under this section and Section 17053.64.

(g) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and the seven succeeding years if necessary,
 until the credit is exhausted.

(h) If the credit allowed by this section is claimed by the qualified taxpayer, any deduction or credit otherwise allowed under this part for any qualified expenditure made by the qualified taxpayer as a trade or business expense shall be reduced by the amount of the credit allowed by this section.

(i) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(j) This section shall remain in effect
 only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 16.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23682.

(a) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2023, and before January 1, 2028, there shall be allowed a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, to a qualified taxpayer in an amount equal to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified taxpayer” means an equity licensee that has received approval, including approval contingent upon the availability of funds, for the fee waiver and deferral program established pursuant to Section 26249 of the Business and Professions Code, as administered by the Department of Cannabis Control.

(c) On January 1, 2024, and every six months thereafter, the Department of Cannabis Control shall
 provide the Franchise Tax Board with a list of qualified taxpayers for the purposes of administering this section. The Department of Cannabis Control may satisfy this requirement by maintaining a database that makes this information available to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) In the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding seven years if necessary, until the credit is exhausted.

(e) This section and Section 17053.82 shall be known and may be cited as the Cannabis Equity Tax Credit.

(f) The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules, guidelines, or procedures necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes of this section, including any guidelines regarding the allocation of the credit allowed under
 this section. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any rule, guideline, or procedure prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 17.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of December 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

23685.

(a) (1) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, there shall be allowed to a qualified taxpayer a credit against the “tax,” as defined in Section 23036, in an amount equal to the applicable percentage, as specified in paragraph (4), of the qualified expenditures for the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(2) The credit shall be allowed for
 the taxable year in which the California Film Commission issues the credit certificate pursuant to subdivision (g) for the qualified motion picture, and shall be for the applicable percentage of all qualified expenditures paid or incurred by the qualified taxpayer in all taxable years for that qualified motion picture.

(3) The amount of the credit allowed to a qualified taxpayer shall be limited to the amount specified in the credit certificate issued to the qualified taxpayer by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(4) For purposes of paragraphs (1) and (2), the applicable percentage shall be:

(A) Twenty percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California.

(B) Twenty-five percent of the qualified expenditures attributable to the production of a qualified motion picture in California where the qualified motion picture is a television series that relocated to California or an independent film.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Ancillary product” means any article for sale to the public that contains a portion of, or any element of, the qualified motion picture.

(2) “Budget” means an estimate of all expenses paid or incurred during the production period of a qualified motion picture. It shall be the same budget used by the qualified taxpayer and production company for all qualified motion picture purposes.

(3) “Clip use” means a use of any portion of a motion picture, other than the
 qualified motion picture, used in the qualified motion picture.

(4) “Credit certificate” means the certificate issued by the California Film Commission pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (g).

(5) (A) “Employee fringe benefits” means the amount allowable as a deduction under this part to the qualified taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture, exclusive of any amounts contributed by employees, for any year during the production period with respect to any of the following:

(i) Employer contributions under any pension, profit-sharing, annuity, or similar plan.

(ii) Employer-provided coverage under any accident or health plan for employees.

(iii) The employer’s cost of life or disability insurance provided to employees.

(B) Any amount treated as wages under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (18) shall not be taken into account under this paragraph.

(6) “Independent film” means a motion picture with a minimum budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and a maximum budget of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) that is produced by a company that is not publicly traded and publicly traded companies do not own, directly or indirectly, more than 25 percent of the producing company.

(7) “Licensing” means any grant of rights to distribute the qualified motion picture, in whole or in part.

(8) “New use” means any use of a motion
 picture in a medium other than the medium for which it was initially created.

(9) (A) “Postproduction” means the final activities in a qualified motion picture’s production, including editing, foley recording, automatic dialogue replacement, sound editing, scoring and music editing, beginning and end credits, negative cutting, negative processing and duplication, the addition of sound and visual effects, soundmixing, film-to-tape transfers, encoding, and color correction.

(B) “Postproduction” does not include the manufacture or shipping of release prints.

(10) “Preproduction” means the process of preparation for actual physical production which begins after a qualified motion picture has received a firm agreement of financial commitment, or is greenlit, with, for example, the establishment of a
 dedicated production office, the hiring of key crew members, and includes, but is not limited to, activities that include location scouting and execution of contracts with vendors of equipment and stage space.

(11) “Principal photography” means the phase of production during which the motion picture is actually shot, as distinguished from preproduction and postproduction.

(12) “Production period” means the period beginning with preproduction and ending upon completion of postproduction.

(13) “Qualified entity” means a personal service corporation as defined in Section 269A(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, a payroll services corporation, or any entity receiving qualified wages with respect to services performed by a qualified individual.

(14) (A) “Qualified individual” means any individual who performs services during the production period in an activity related to the production of a qualified motion picture.

(B) “Qualified individual” shall not include either of the following:

(i) Any individual related to the qualified taxpayer as described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of Section 51(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(ii) Any 5-percent owner, as defined in Section 416(i)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, of the qualified taxpayer.

(15) (A) “Qualified motion picture” means a motion picture that is produced for distribution to the general public, regardless of medium, that is one of the following:

(i) A feature with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) and a maximum production budget of seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000).

(ii) A movie of the week or miniseries with a minimum production budget of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(iii) A new television series produced in California with a minimum production budget of one million dollars ($1,000,000) licensed for original distribution on basic cable.

(iv) An independent film.

(v) A television series that relocated to California.

(B) To qualify as a “qualified motion picture,” all of the following conditions shall be satisfied:

(i) At least 75 percent of the production days occur wholly in California or 75 percent of the production budget is incurred for payment for services performed within the state and the purchase or rental of property used within the state.

(ii) Production of the qualified motion picture is completed within 30 months from the date on which the qualified taxpayer’s application is approved by the California Film Commission. For purposes of this section, a qualified motion picture is “completed” when the process of postproduction has been finished.

(iii) The copyright for the motion picture is registered with the United States Copyright Office pursuant to Title 17 of the United States Code.

(iv) Principal photography of the qualified motion picture commences after the date on which the application is approved
 by the California Film Commission, but no later than 180 days after the date of that approval.

(C) For the purposes of subparagraph (A), in computing the total wages paid or incurred for the production of a qualified motion picture, all amounts paid or incurred by all persons or entities that share in the costs of the qualified motion picture shall be aggregated.

(D) “Qualified motion picture” shall not include commercial advertising, music videos, a motion picture produced for private noncommercial use, such as weddings, graduations, or as part of an educational course and made by students, a news program, current events or public events program, talk show, game show, sporting event or activity, awards show, telethon or other production that solicits funds, reality television program, clip-based programming if more than 50 percent of the content is comprised of licensed footage,
 documentaries, variety programs, daytime dramas, strip shows, one-half hour (air time) episodic television shows, or any production that falls within the recordkeeping requirements of Section 2257 of Title 18 of the United States Code.

(16) “Qualified expenditures” means amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture and payments, including qualified wages, for services performed within this state in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(17) (A) “Qualified taxpayer” means a taxpayer who has paid or incurred qualified expenditures and has been issued a credit certificate by the California Film Commission pursuant to subdivision (g).

(B) (i) In the case of any pass-thru
 entity, the determination of whether a taxpayer is a qualified taxpayer under this section shall be made at the entity level and any credit under this section is not allowed to the pass-thru entity, but shall be passed through to the partners or shareholders in accordance with applicable provisions of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001). For purposes of this paragraph, “pass-thru entity” means any entity taxed as a partnership or “S” corporation.

(ii) In the case of an “S” corporation, the credit allowed under this section shall not be used by an “S” corporation as a credit against a tax imposed under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 23800) of Part 11 of Division 2.

(18) (A) “Qualified wages” means all of the following:

(i) Any wages subject to
 withholding under Division 6 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Unemployment Insurance Code that were paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of a qualified motion picture with respect to a qualified individual for services performed on the qualified motion picture production within this state.

(ii) The portion of any employee fringe benefits paid or incurred by any taxpayer involved in the production of the qualified motion picture that are properly allocable to qualified wage amounts described in clause (i).

(iii) Any payments made to a qualified entity for services performed in this state by qualified individuals within the meaning of paragraph (14).

(iv) Remuneration paid to an independent contractor who is a qualified individual for services performed within this state by that qualified
 individual.

(B) “Qualified wages” shall not include any of the following:

(i) Expenses, including wages, related to new use, reuse, clip use, licensing, secondary markets, or residual compensation, or the creation of any ancillary product, including, but not limited to, a soundtrack album, toy, game, trailer, or teaser.

(ii) Expenses, including wages, paid or incurred with respect to acquisition, development, turnaround, or any rights thereto.

(iii) Expenses, including wages, related to financing, overhead, marketing, promotion, or distribution of a qualified motion picture.

(iv) Expenses, including wages, paid per person per qualified motion picture for writers, directors, music
 directors, music composers, music supervisors, producers, and performers, other than background actors with no scripted lines.

(19) “Residual compensation” means supplemental compensation paid at the time that a motion picture is exhibited through new use, reuse, clip use, or in secondary markets, as distinguished from payments made during production.

(20) “Reuse” means any use of a qualified motion picture in the same medium for which it was created, following the initial use in that medium.

(21) “Secondary markets” means media in which a qualified motion picture is exhibited following the initial media in which it is exhibited.

(22) “Television series that relocated to California” means a television series, without regard to episode length or initial
 media exhibition, that filmed all of its prior season or seasons outside of California and for which the taxpayer certifies that the credit provided pursuant to this section is the primary reason for relocating to California.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 23036, in the case where the credit allowed by this section exceeds the taxpayer’s tax liability computed under this part, a qualified taxpayer may elect to assign any portion of the credit allowed under this section to one or more affiliated corporations for each taxable year in which the credit is allowed. For purposes of this subdivision, “affiliated corporation” has the meaning provided in subdivision (b) of Section 25110, as that section was amended by Chapter 881 of the Statutes of 1993, as of the last day of the taxable year in which the credit is allowed, except that “100 percent” is substituted for “more than 50 percent” wherever it appears
 in the section, and “voting common stock” is substituted for “voting stock” wherever it appears in the section.

(2) The election provided in paragraph (1):

(A) May be based on any method selected by the qualified taxpayer that originally receives the credit.

(B) Shall be irrevocable for the taxable year the credit is allowed, once made.

(C) May be changed for any subsequent taxable year if the election to make the assignment is expressly shown on each of the returns of the qualified taxpayer and the qualified taxpayer’s affiliated corporations that assign and receive the credits.

(D) Shall be reported to the Franchise Tax Board, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board,
 along with all required information regarding the assignment of the credit, including the corporation number, the federal employer identification number, or other taxpayer identification number of the assignee, and the amount of the credit assigned.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding any other law, a qualified taxpayer may sell any credit allowed under this section that is attributable to an independent film, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), to an unrelated party.

(B) The qualified taxpayer shall report to the Franchise Tax Board prior to the sale of the credit, in the form and manner specified by the Franchise Tax Board, all required information regarding the purchase and sale of the credit, including the social security or other taxpayer identification number of the unrelated party to whom the credit has been sold, the face amount of the credit sold,
 and the amount of consideration received by the qualified taxpayer for the sale of the credit.

(4) In the case where the credit allowed under this section exceeds the “tax,” the excess credit may be carried over to reduce the “tax” in the following taxable year, and succeeding five taxable years, if necessary, until the credit has been exhausted.

(5) A credit shall not be sold pursuant to this subdivision to more than one taxpayer, nor may the credit be resold by the unrelated party to another taxpayer or other party.

(6) A party that has been assigned or acquired tax credits under this paragraph shall be subject to the requirements of this section.

(7) In no event may a qualified taxpayer assign or sell any tax credit to the extent the tax credit
 allowed by this section is claimed on any tax return of the qualified taxpayer.

(8) In the event that both the taxpayer originally allocated a credit under this section by the California Film Commission and a taxpayer to whom the credit has been sold both claim the same amount of credit on their tax returns, the Franchise Tax Board may disallow the credit of either taxpayer, so long as the statute of limitations upon assessment remains open.

(9) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this subdivision.

(10) Subdivision (i) of Section 23036 shall not apply to any credit sold pursuant to this
 subdivision.

(11) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) An affiliated corporation or corporations that are assigned a credit pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(B) The unrelated party or parties that purchase a credit pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be treated as a qualified taxpayer pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(d) No credit shall be allowed pursuant to this section unless the qualified taxpayer provides the following to the California Film Commission:

(1) Identification of each qualified individual.

(2) The specific start and end
 dates of production.

(3) The total wages paid.

(4) The amount of qualified wages paid to each qualified individual.

(5) The copyright registration number, as reflected on the certificate of registration issued under the authority of Section 410 of Title 17 of the United States Code, relating to registration of claim and issuance of certificate. The registration number shall be provided on the return claiming the credit.

(6) The total amounts paid or incurred to purchase or lease tangible personal property used in the production of a qualified motion picture.

(7) Information to substantiate its qualified expenditures.

(8) Information required by the California Film Commission under regulations promulgated pursuant to subdivision (g) necessary to verify the amount of credit claimed.

(e) The California Film Commission may prescribe rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of this section including any rules and regulations necessary to establish procedures, processes, requirements, and rules identified in or required to implement this section. The regulations shall include provisions to set aside a percentage of annual credit allocations for independent films.

(f) If the qualified taxpayer fails to provide the copyright registration number as required in paragraph (5) of subdivision (d), the credit shall be disallowed and assessed and collected under Section 19051 until the procedures are satisfied.

(g) For
 purposes of this section, the California Film Commission shall do the following:

(1) On or after July 1, 2009, and before July 1, 2017, allocate tax credits to applicants.
